Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6731
Informal conference; procedure.

If an informal conference is requested, the department shall assign a representative of the department to hold an informal conference with the applicant or registrant within fifteen working days after receipt of a request. Within seven working days after the conclusion of such conference, the representative shall affirm, modify, or dismiss the action. The representative shall state in writing the specific reasons for affirming, modifying, or dismissing the action and shall immediately transmit copies of the statement to the department and to the applicant or the registrant. If the representative affirms or modifies the action, it shall become final unless the applicant or registrant, within ten working days after receipt of the written notice, requests in writing a formal hearing to contest the action.

Laws 1998, LB 1354, § 21.